District of Columbia statutes.
38-2001.10a

Death of teacher — Precedence of payments.

In the event of death of any such teacher the order of precedence of payments shall be as follows: first, to the beneficiary, or beneficiaries, designated in writing by the teacher and recorded on his or her individual account; second, if there be no such beneficiary or beneficiaries designated, then to the duly appointed executor, or administrator, of the estate; third, if there be no such beneficiary, or if an executor or administrator be not appointed within 6 months after the death of such teacher, payment shall be made into the registry of the court having probate jurisdiction.

History

Apr. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 571, ch. 42, § 2
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 577, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 158(g)

Cross References

Probate jurisdiction, see §§ 11-501, 11-921.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1211.
1973 Ed., § 31-711.